Nebraska, session 109, LB478.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 53-101, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
53-101 Sections 53-101 to 53-1,122 and section 2 of this act shall be
known and may be cited as the Nebraska Liquor Control Act.
Sec. 2. (1) The commission may issue an auction permit to an auction
house which authorizes the holder thereof to sell alcoholic liquor at auction
as prescribed in this section.
(2) An auction house may apply in a manner prescribed by the commission
for an auction permit from the commission. An auction permit shall be required
for the sale at auction of (a) alcoholic liquor previously sold to a retailer
that is no longer in operation or (b) alcoholic liquor that had previously been
sold at retail to a consumer in the State of Nebraska in a private collection.
(3) An auction house that holds an auction permit shall notify the
commission of all auctions and provide inventories of the product to be sold.
(4) The commission may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry
out this section.
Sec. 3. Section 53-123.15, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
53-123.15 (1) No person shall order or receive alcoholic liquor in this
state which has been shipped directly to him or her from outside this state by
any person other than a holder of a shipping license issued by the commission,
except that a licensed wholesaler may receive not more than three gallons of
wine in any calendar year from any person who is not a holder of a shipping
license.
(2) The commission may issue a shipping license to a manufacturer. Such
license shall allow the licensee to ship alcoholic liquor only to a licensed
wholesaler. A person who receives a license pursuant to this subsection shall
pay the fee required in sections 53-124 and 53-124.01 for a manufacturer's
shipping license. Such fee shall be collected by the commission and be remitted
to the State Treasurer for credit to the General Fund, except that the fee
received for a shipping license issued to a beer manufacturer pursuant to this
subsection shall be credited to the Nebraska Beer Industry Promotional Fund.
(3) The commission may issue a shipping license to any person who deals
with vintage wines, which shipping license shall allow the licensee to
distribute such wines to a licensed wholesaler in the state. For purposes of
distributing vintage wines, a licensed shipper must utilize a designated
wholesaler if the manufacturer has a designated wholesaler. For purposes of
this section, vintage wine shall mean a wine verified to be ten years of age or
older and not available from a primary American source of supply. A person who
receives a license pursuant to this subsection shall pay the fee required in
sections 53-124 and 53-124.01 for a vintage wine dealer's shipping license.
Such fee shall be collected by the commission and be remitted to the State
Treasurer for credit to the General Fund.
(4) The commission may issue a shipping license to a wholesaler located
outside the State of Nebraska. Such license shall allow the licensee to ship
alcoholic liquor only to a licensed Nebraska wholesaler. A person who receives
a license pursuant to this subsection shall pay the fee required in sections
53-124 and 53-124.01 for a wholesalers shipping license. Such fee shall be
collected by the commission and be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit
to the General Fund.
(5) (4) The commission may issue a shipping license to any manufacturer
who sells and ships alcoholic liquor from another state directly to a consumer
in this state if the manufacturer satisfies the requirements of subsections (8)
(7) through (10) (9) of this section. A manufacturer who receives a license
pursuant to this subsection shall pay the fee required in sections 53-124 and
53-124.01 for a manufacture direct sales shipping license. Such fee shall be
collected by the commission and remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to
the Winery and Grape Producers Promotional Fund.
-1-

LB478 LB478
2025 2025
(6) (5) The commission may issue a shipping license to any retailer who is
licensed within or outside Nebraska, who is authorized to sell alcoholic liquor
at retail in the state of domicile of the retailer, and who is not a
manufacturer if such retailer satisfies the requirements of subsections (8) (7)
through (10) (9) of this section to ship alcoholic liquor from another state
directly to a consumer in this state. A retailer who receives a license
pursuant to this subsection shall pay the fee required in sections 53-124 and
53-124.01 for a retail direct sales shipping license. Such fee shall be
collected by the commission and remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to
the Winery and Grape Producers Promotional Fund.
(7) (6) The application for a shipping license under subsection (2) or (3)
of this section shall be in such form as the commission prescribes. The
application shall contain all provisions the commission deems proper and
necessary to effectuate the purpose of any section of the act and the rules and
regulations of the commission that apply to manufacturers and shall include,
but not be limited to, provisions that the applicant, in consideration of the
issuance of such shipping license, agrees:
(a) To comply with and be bound by sections 53-162 and 53-164.01 in making
and filing reports, paying taxes, penalties, and interest, and keeping records;
(b) To permit and be subject to all of the powers granted by section
53-164.01 to the commission or its duly authorized employees or agents for
inspection and examination of the applicant's premises and records and to pay
the actual expenses, excluding salary, reasonably attributable to such
inspections and examinations made by duly authorized employees of the
commission if within the United States; and
(c) That if the applicant violates any of the provisions of the
application or the license, any section of the act, or any of the rules and
regulations of the commission that apply to manufacturers, the commission may
suspend, cancel, or revoke such shipping license for such period of time as it
may determine.
(8) (7) The application for a shipping license under subsection (5) (4) or
(6) (5) of this section shall be in such form as the commission prescribes. The
application shall require an applicant which is a manufacturer, a craft
brewery, a craft distillery, or a farm winery to identify the brands of
alcoholic liquor that the applicant is requesting the authority to ship either
into or within Nebraska. For all applicants, unless otherwise provided in this
section, the application shall contain all provisions the commission deems
proper and necessary to effectuate the purpose of any section of the act and
the rules and regulations of the commission that apply to manufacturers or
retailers and shall include, but not be limited to, provisions that the
applicant, in consideration of the issuance of such shipping license, agrees:
(a) To comply with and be bound by sections 53-162 and 53-164.01 in making
and filing reports, paying taxes, penalties, and interest, and keeping records;
(b) To permit and be subject to all of the powers granted by section
53-164.01 to the commission or its duly authorized employees or agents for
inspection and examination of the applicant's premises and records and to pay
the actual expenses, excluding salary, reasonably attributable to such
inspections and examinations made by duly authorized employees of the
commission if within the United States;
(c) That if the applicant violates any of the provisions of the
application or the license, any section of the act, or any of the rules and
regulations of the commission that apply to manufacturers or retailers, the
commission may suspend, cancel, or revoke such shipping license for such period
of time as it may determine;
(d) That the applicant agrees to notify the commission of any violations
in the state in which he or she is domiciled and any violations of the direct
shipping laws of any other states. Failure to notify the commission within
thirty days after such a violation may result in a hearing before the
commission pursuant to which the license may be suspended, canceled, or
revoked; and
(e) That the applicant, if a manufacturer, craft brewery, craft
distillery, or farm winery, agrees to notify any wholesaler licensed in
Nebraska that has been authorized to distribute such brands that the
application has been filed for a shipping license. The notice shall be in
writing and in a form prescribed by the commission. The commission may adopt
and promulgate rules and regulations as it reasonably deems necessary to
implement this subdivision, including rules and regulations that permit the
holder of a shipping license under this subdivision to amend the shipping
license by, among other things, adding or deleting any brands of alcoholic
liquor identified in the shipping license.
(9) (8) Any manufacturer or retailer who is granted a shipping license
under subsection (5) (4) or (6) (5) of this section shall:
(a) Only ship the brands of alcoholic liquor identified on the
application;
(b) Only ship alcoholic liquor that is owned by the holder of the shipping
license;
(c) Only ship alcoholic liquor that is properly registered with the
Alcohol and Tobacco Tax and Trade Bureau of the United States Department of the
Treasury;
(d) Not ship any alcoholic liquor products that the manufacturers or
wholesalers licensed in Nebraska have voluntarily agreed not to bring into
Nebraska at the request of the commission;
(e) Not ship more than nine liters of alcoholic liquor per month to any
-2-

LB478 LB478
2025 2025
person in Nebraska to whom alcoholic beverages may be lawfully sold. All such
sales and shipments shall be for personal consumption only and not for resale;
and
(f) Cause the direct shipment of alcoholic liquor to be by approved common
carrier only. The commission shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations
pursuant to which common carriers may apply for approval to provide common
carriage of alcoholic liquor shipped by a holder of a shipping license issued
pursuant to subsection (5) (4) or (6) (5) of this section. The rules and
regulations shall include provisions that require (i) the recipient to
demonstrate, upon delivery, that he or she is at least twenty-one years of age,
(ii) the recipient to sign an electronic or paper form or other acknowledgment
of receipt as approved by the commission, and (iii) the commission-approved
common carrier to submit to the commission such information as the commission
may prescribe. The commission-approved common carrier shall refuse delivery
when the proposed recipient appears to be under the age of twenty-one years and
refuses to present valid identification. All holders of shipping licenses
shipping alcoholic liquor pursuant to this subdivision shall affix a
conspicuous notice in sixteen-point type or larger to the outside of each
package of alcoholic liquor shipped within or into the State of Nebraska, in a
conspicuous location, stating: CONTAINS ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES; SIGNATURE OF
PERSON AT LEAST 21 YEARS OF AGE REQUIRED FOR DELIVERY. Any delivery of
alcoholic beverages to a minor by a common carrier shall constitute a violation
by the common carrier. The common carrier and the holder of the shipping
license shall be liable only for their independent acts.
(10) (9) For purposes of sections 53-160, 77-2703, and 77-27,142, each
shipment of alcoholic liquor by the holder of a shipping license under
subsection (3), (5) (4), or (6) (5) of this section shall constitute a sale in
Nebraska by establishing a nexus in the state. The holder of the shipping
license shall collect all the taxes due to the State of Nebraska and any
political subdivision and remit any excise taxes monthly to the commission and
any sales taxes to the Department of Revenue.
(11) (10) By July 1, 2014, the commission shall report to the General
Affairs Committee of the Legislature the number of shipping licenses issued for
license years 2013-14 and 2014-15. The report shall be made electronically.
Sec. 4. Section 53-124, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
53-124 (1) At the time application is made to the commission for a license
of any type, the applicant shall pay the fee provided in section 53-124.01 and,
if the applicant is an individual, provide the applicant's social security
number. The commission shall issue the types of licenses described in this
section.
(2) There shall be an airline license, a boat license, a special party bus
license, a pedal-pub vehicle license, and a railroad license. The commission
shall charge one dollar for each duplicate of an airline license, a special
party bus license, a pedal-pub vehicle license, or a railroad license.
(3)(a) There shall be a manufacturer's license for alcohol and spirits,
for beer, and for wine. The annual fee for a manufacturer's license for beer
shall be based on the barrel daily capacity as follows:
(i) 1 to 100 barrel daily capacity, or any part thereof, tier one;
(ii) 100 to 150 barrel daily capacity, tier two;
(iii) 150 to 200 barrel daily capacity, tier three;
(iv) 200 to 300 barrel daily capacity, tier four;
(v) 300 to 400 barrel daily capacity, tier five;
(vi) 400 to 500 barrel daily capacity, tier six;
(vii) 500 barrel daily capacity, or more, tier seven.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, daily capacity means the average
daily barrel production for the previous twelve months of manufacturing
operation. If no such basis for comparison exists, the manufacturing licensee
shall pay in advance for the first year's operation a fee of five hundred
dollars.
(4) There shall be five classes of nonbeverage users' licenses: Class 1,
Class 2, Class 3, Class 4, and Class 5.
(5) In lieu of a manufacturer's, a retailer's, or a wholesaler's license,
there shall be a license to operate issued for a craft brewery, a farm winery,
or a microdistillery.
(6)(a) There shall be six classes of retail licenses:
(i) Class A: Beer only, for consumption on the premises;
(ii) Class B: Beer only, for consumption off the premises, sales in the
original packages only;
(iii) Class C: Alcoholic liquor, for consumption on the premises and off
the premises, sales in original packages only except as provided in subsection
(4) of section 53-123.04. If a Class C license is held by a nonprofit
corporation, it shall be restricted to consumption on the premises only. A
Class C license may have a sampling designation restricting consumption on the
premises to sampling, but such designation shall not affect sales for
consumption off the premises under such license;
(iv) Class D: Alcoholic liquor, including beer, for consumption off the
premises, sales in the original packages only, except as provided in
subdivision (6)(a)(vi) of this section and subsection (2) of section 53-123.04;
(v) Class I: Alcoholic liquor, for consumption on the premises except as
provided in subsection (5) of section 53-123.04; and
(vi) Class J: Alcoholic liquor, including beer, for consumption off the
premises, sales in the original packages only, for a retail licensee whose
-3-

LB478 LB478
2025 2025
annual gross revenue from the sale of alcohol does not exceed twenty percent of
the licensee's total annual gross revenue from all retail sales.
(b) All applicable license fees shall be paid by the applicant or licensee
directly to the city or village treasurer in the case of premises located
inside the corporate limits of a city or village and directly to the county
treasurer in the case of premises located outside the corporate limits of a
city or village.
(7) There shall be five four types of shipping licenses as described in
section 53-123.15: Manufacturers, wholesalers, vintage wines, manufacture
direct sales, and retail direct sales.
(8) There shall be two types of wholesale licenses: Alcoholic liquor and
beer only. The annual fee shall be paid for the first and each additional
wholesale place of business operated in this state by the same licensee and
wholesaling the same product.
(9) There shall be a bottle club license. All applicable license fees
shall be paid by the applicant or licensee directly to the city or village
treasurer in the case of premises located inside the corporate limits of a city
or village and directly to the county treasurer in the case of premises located
outside the corporate limits of a city or village.
(10) The license year, unless otherwise provided in the Nebraska Liquor
Control Act, shall commence on May 1 of each year and shall end on the
following April 30, except that the license year for a Class C license shall
commence on November 1 of each year and shall end on the following October 31.
During the license year, no license shall be issued for a sum less than the
amount of the annual license fee as fixed in section 53-124.01, regardless of
the time when the application for such license has been made, except that (a)
when there is a purchase of an existing licensed business and a new license of
the same class is issued or (b) upon the issuance of a new license for a
location which has not been previously licensed, the license fee and occupation
taxes shall be prorated on a quarterly basis as of the date of issuance.
Sec. 5. Section 53-124.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
53-124.01 (1) The fees for annual licenses finally issued by the
commission shall be as provided in this section and section 53-124.
(2) Airline license ... $100
(3) Boat license ... $50
(4) Bottle club license ... $300
(5) Special party bus license ... $75
(6) Manufacturer's license:
Class Fee - In Dollars
Alcohol and spirits 1,000
Beer - tier one 100
Beer - tier two 200
Beer - tier three 350
Beer - tier four 500
Beer - tier five 650
Beer - tier six 700
Beer - tier seven 800
Wine 250
(7) Nonbeverage user's license:
Class Fee - In Dollars
Class 1 5
Class 2 25
Class 3 50
Class 4 100
Class 5 250
(8) Operator's license:
Class Fee - In Dollars
Craft brewery 250
Farm winery 250
-4-

LB478 LB478
2025 2025
Microdistillery 250
(9) Pedal-pub vehicle license ... $50
(10) Railroad license ... $100
(11) Retail license:
Class Fee - In Dollars
Class A 100
Class B 100
Class C 300
Class D 200
Class I 250
Class J 50
(12) Shipping license:
Class Fee - In Dollars
Manufacturer 1,000
Wholesaler 1,000
Vintage wines 1,000
Manufacture direct sales 500
Retail direct sales 500
(13) Wholesale license:
Class Fee - In Dollars
Alcoholic liquor 750
Beer 500
Sec. 6. Section 53-130, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
53-130 (1) New licenses to manufacturers, wholesalers, railroads,
airlines, boats, special party buses, pedal-pub vehicles, and nonbeverage users
of alcoholic liquor may be issued by the commission upon (a) written
application in duplicate filed in the manner and on such forms as the
commission prescribes and in which the applicant for a beer wholesale license
sets forth the sales territory in Nebraska in which it is authorized by a
manufacturer or manufacturers to sell their brand or brands and the name of
such brand or brands, (b) receipt of bond, (c) payment in advance of the
nonrefundable application fee of forty-five dollars and the license fee, and
(d) such notice and hearing as the commission fixes by its own order.
(2) A notice of such application shall be served upon the manufacturer or
manufacturers listed in any application for a beer wholesale license and upon
any existing wholesaler licensed to sell the brand or brands in the described
sales territory.
(3) A license so issued may be renewed without formal application upon
payment of license fees and a renewal fee of forty-five dollars prior to or
within thirty days after the expiration of the license. The payment of such
fees shall be an affirmative representation and certification by the licensee
that all answers contained in an application, if submitted, would be the same
in all material respects as the answers contained in the last previous
application. The commission may at any time require a licensee to submit an
application.
Sec. 7. Section 53-131.01, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
53-131.01 (1) The application for a new license shall be submitted upon
such forms as the commission may prescribe. Such forms shall contain (a) the
name and residence of the applicant and how long he or she has resided within
the State of Nebraska, (b) the particular premises for which a license is
desired designating the same by street and number if practicable or, if not, by
such other description as definitely locates the premises, (c) the name of the
owner of the premises upon which the business licensed is to be carried on, (d)
a statement that the applicant is a resident of Nebraska and legally able to
work in Nebraska, that the applicant and the spouse of the applicant are not
less than twenty-one years of age, and that such applicant has never been
convicted of or pleaded guilty to a felony or been adjudged guilty of violating
the laws governing the sale of alcoholic liquor or the law for the prevention
of gambling in the State of Nebraska, except that a manager for a corporation
applying for a license shall qualify with all provisions of this subdivision as
though the manager were the applicant, except that the provisions of this
-5-

LB478 LB478
2025 2025
subdivision shall not apply to the spouse of a manager-applicant, (e) a
statement that the applicant intends to carry on the business authorized by the
license for himself or herself and not as the agent of any other persons and
that if licensed he or she will carry on such business for himself or herself
and not as the agent for any other person, (f) a statement that the applicant
intends to superintend in person the management of the business licensed and
that if so licensed he or she will superintend in person the management of the
business, and (g) such other information as the commission may from time to
time direct. The applicant shall also submit a two legible set sets of
fingerprints to be furnished to the Federal Bureau of Investigation through the
Nebraska State Patrol for a national criminal history record check and the fee
for such record check payable to the patrol.
(2) If any false statement is made in any part of such application, the
applicant or applicants shall be deemed guilty of perjury, and upon conviction
thereof the license shall be revoked and the applicant subjected to the
penalties provided by law for that crime.
Sec. 8. Section 53-134, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
53-134 The local governing body of any city or village with respect to
licenses within its corporate limits and the local governing body of any county
with respect to licenses not within the corporate limits of any city or village
but within the county shall have the following powers, functions, and duties
with respect to retail, bottle club, craft brewery, microdistillery, and
entertainment district licenses:
(1) To cancel or revoke for cause retail, craft brewery, microdistillery,
or entertainment district licenses to sell or dispense alcoholic liquor or
bottle club licenses, issued to persons for premises within its jurisdiction,
subject to the right of appeal to the commission;
(2) To enter or to authorize any law enforcement officer to enter at any
time upon any premises licensed under the Nebraska Liquor Control Act to
determine whether any provision of the act, any rule or regulation adopted and
promulgated pursuant to the act, or any ordinance, resolution, rule, or
regulation adopted by the local governing body has been or is being violated
and at such time examine the premises of such licensee in connection with such
determination. Any law enforcement officer who determines that any provision of
the act, any rule or regulation adopted and promulgated pursuant to the act, or
any ordinance, resolution, rule, or regulation adopted by the local governing
body has been or is being violated shall report such violation in writing to
the executive director of the commission (a) within thirty days after
determining that such violation has occurred, (b) within thirty days after the
conclusion of an ongoing police investigation, or (c) within thirty days after
the verdict in a prosecution related to such an ongoing police investigation if
the prosecuting attorney determines that reporting such violation prior to the
verdict would jeopardize such prosecution, whichever is later;
(3) To receive a signed complaint from any citizen within its jurisdiction
that any provision of the act, any rule or regulation adopted and promulgated
pursuant to the act, or any ordinance, resolution, rule, or regulation relating
to alcoholic liquor has been or is being violated and to act upon such
complaints in the manner provided in the act;
(4) To receive retail license fees, bottle club license fees, craft
brewery license fees, and microdistillery license fees as provided in sections
53-124 and 53-124.01 and entertainment district license fees as provided in
section 53-123.17 and pay the same, after the license has been delivered to the
applicant, to the city, village, or county treasurer;
(5) To examine or cause to be examined any applicant or any retail
licensee, bottle club licensee, craft brewery licensee, microdistillery
licensee, or entertainment district licensee upon whom notice of cancellation
or revocation has been served as provided in the act, to examine or cause to be
examined the books and records of any applicant or licensee except as otherwise
provided for bottle club licensees in section 53-123.08, and to hear testimony
and to take proof for its information in the performance of its duties. For
purposes of obtaining any of the information desired, the local governing body
may authorize its agent or attorney to act on its behalf;
(6) To cancel or revoke on its own motion any license if, upon the same
notice and hearing as provided in section 53-134.04, it determines that the
licensee has violated any of the provisions of the act or any valid and
subsisting ordinance, resolution, rule, or regulation duly enacted, adopted,
and promulgated relating to alcoholic liquor. Such order of cancellation or
revocation may be appealed to the commission within thirty days after the date
of the order by filing a notice of appeal with the commission. The commission
shall handle the appeal in the manner provided for hearing on an application in
section 53-133;
(7) Upon receipt from the commission of the notice and copy of application
as provided in section 53-131, to fix a time and place for a hearing at which
the local governing body shall receive evidence, either orally or by affidavit
from the applicant and any other person, bearing upon the propriety of the
issuance of a license. Notice of the time and place of such hearing shall be
published in a legal newspaper in or of statewide circulation or general
circulation in such city, village, or county one time not less than seven and
not more than fourteen days before the time of the hearing. Such notice shall
include, but not be limited to, a statement that all persons desiring to give
evidence before the local governing body in support of or in protest against
the issuance of such license may do so at the time of the hearing. Such hearing
-6-

LB478 LB478
2025 2025
shall be held not more than forty-five days after the date of receipt of the
notice from the commission, and after such hearing the local governing body
shall cause to be recorded in the minute record of their proceedings a
resolution recommending either issuance or refusal of such license. The clerk
of such city, village, or county shall mail to the commission by first-class
mail, postage prepaid, a copy of the resolution which shall state the cost of
the published notice, except that failure to comply with this provision shall
not void any license issued by the commission. If the commission refuses to
issue such a license, the cost of publication of notice shall be paid by the
commission from the security for costs;
(8) To review and authorize an application by a retail, bottle club, craft
brewery, farm winery, or microdistillery licensee for a temporary expansion of
its licensed premises within the jurisdiction of the local governing body to an
immediately adjacent area owned or leased by the licensee or to an immediately
adjacent street, parking lot, or alley, not to exceed fifty days for calendar
year 2020 and, for each calendar year thereafter, not to exceed fifteen days
per calendar year, as provided in sections 53-123.12 and 53-129; and
(9) To review and authorize an application by a craft brewery, farm
winery, or microdistillery licensee that holds a promotional farmers market
special designated license for a permit to use such promotional farmers market
special designated license to sell or dispense alcoholic liquor, which the
holder is licensed to produce, at a farmers market within the jurisdiction of
the local governing body as provided in section 53-124.17. The local governing
body shall electronically notify the commission within five days after
authorization of any permit pursuant to this subdivision.
Sec. 9. Section 53-162, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
53-162 For the purpose of raising revenue, a tax is imposed upon persons
holding a shipping license issued pursuant to subsection (5) (4) or (6) (5) of
section 53-123.15 who ship alcoholic liquor to individuals pursuant to section
53-192 and for which the required taxes in the state of purchase or this state
have not been paid. The tax, if due, shall be paid by the holder of the
shipping license issued pursuant to subsection (5) (4) or (6) (5) of section
53-123.15. The amount of the tax shall be imposed as provided in section
53-160. The tax shall be collected by the commission, except that the tax shall
not be due until December 31 of the year in which the purchase was made. The
tax shall be delinquent if unpaid within twenty-five days after December 31.
The revenue from the tax shall be credited to the General Fund. The commission
shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out this section.
Sec. 10. Section 53-165.01, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
53-165.01 (1)(a) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section,
beginning Beginning July 1, 2024, prior to the sale or shipment of any
alcoholic liquor into the State of Nebraska, each licensed manufacturer,
licensed wholesaler, or holder of a shipping license shall submit to the
commission, along with any applicable fee set by the commission not to exceed
thirty dollars, a report on a form prescribed and furnished by the commission,
which shall include:
(i) The licensee's name and license number;
(ii) The designated Nebraska licensed wholesaler for such product, if
applicable;
(iii) The name of the primary source of supply in the United States;
(iv) The products to be imported, including the brand name, class or type
of product, and fanciful name if applicable;
(v) Evidence of compliance with federal label requirements pursuant to the
Federal Alcohol Administration Act, 27 U.S.C. chapter 8, and rules and
regulations adopted pursuant to such act, as such act and regulations existed
on January 1, 2023, or a sample of the actual label if federal approval is not
required; and
(vi) Any other information the commission may require related to such sale
or shipment.
(b) If the licensed manufacturer, licensed wholesaler, or holder of a
shipping license is not the product manufacturer, such licensee shall also
include with such form a separate letter from the product manufacturer
designating such licensee as the primary source of supply in the United States
or the sole source of supply in Nebraska. A separate letter is required for
each primary source.
(2) The primary source of supply as designated to the commission pursuant
to subsection (1) of this section shall reaffirm the brands to be shipped into
the State of Nebraska by July 1 of each year, with a renewal period starting
ninety days prior to July 1. The commission may charge an applicable renewal
fee not to exceed thirty dollars, on a form prescribed and furnished by the
commission.
(3) (2) If the primary source of supply in the United States for such
alcoholic liquor changes, the new licensed manufacturer, licensed wholesaler,
or holder of a shipping license importing such alcoholic liquor shall submit
the information required pursuant to subsection (1) of this section at least
thirty days prior to the shipment of such alcoholic liquor into this state. The
licensed manufacturer, licensed wholesaler, or holder of a shipping license
shall also remit to the commission any applicable fee set by the commission not
to exceed thirty dollars.
(4) A retailer who is licensed within or outside Nebraska and who holds a
shipping license to ship alcoholic liquor from another state directly to a
-7-

LB478 LB478
2025 2025
consumer in this state pursuant to subsection (6) of section 53-123.15 is
exempt from filing the report described in this section.
(5) (3) Nothing in this section shall restrict or prohibit the importation
of alcoholic liquor to a Nebraska licensed wholesaler from an affiliated
wholesaler if (a) the report required by this section has previously been
submitted for the alcoholic liquor product being imported, (b) the report
designates the Nebraska licensed wholesaler for such product, and (c) the
product was obtained by the affiliated wholesaler from the same primary source
of supply identified on the report.
(6) (4) The commission shall remit any fees collected pursuant to this
section to the State Treasurer for credit to the Nebraska Liquor Control
Commission Rule and Regulation Cash Fund.
(7) (5) The commission may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to
carry out this section.
Sec. 11. Section 53-304, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
53-304 Each Nebraska winery shall pay to the Nebraska Liquor Control
Commission twenty dollars for every one hundred sixty gallons of juice produced
or received by its facility. Gifts, grants, or bequests may be received for the
support of the Nebraska Grape and Winery Board. Funds paid pursuant to the
charge imposed by this section and funds received pursuant to subsection (5)
(4) or (6) (5) of section 53-123.15 and from gifts, grants, or bequests shall
be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Winery and Grape Producers
Promotional Fund which is hereby created. For administrative purposes, the fund
shall be located in the Department of Agriculture. All revenue credited to the
fund pursuant to the charge imposed by this section and excise taxes collected
pursuant to section 2-5603 and any funds received as gifts, grants, or bequests
and credited to the fund shall be used by the department, at the direction of
and in cooperation with the board, to develop and maintain programs for the
research and advancement of the growing, selling, marketing, and promotion of
grapes, fruits, berries, honey, and other agricultural products and their
byproducts grown and produced in Nebraska for use in the wine industry. Such
expenditures may include, but are not limited to, all necessary funding for the
employment of experts in the fields of viticulture and enology, as deemed
necessary by the board, and programs aimed at improving the promotion of all
varieties of wines, grapes, fruits, berries, honey, and other agricultural
products and their byproducts grown and produced in Nebraska for use in the
wine industry.
Funds credited to the fund shall be used for no other purposes than those
stated in this section and any transfers authorized pursuant to section 2-5604.
Any funds not expended during a fiscal year may be maintained in the fund for
distribution or expenditure during subsequent fiscal years. Any money in the
fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer
pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds
Investment Act.
Sec. 12. Original sections 53-123.15, 53-124, 53-124.01, 53-130, 53-134,
53-162, and 53-304, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, and sections 53-101,
53-131.01, and 53-165.01, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are
repealed.
-8-